Washington statutes.
RCW 19.60.068

Resale agreement to avoid interest and fee restrictions prohibited.

A purchase of personal property shall not be made on the condition of selling it back at a stipulated time and price greater than the purchase price, for the purpose of avoiding the interest and fee restrictions of this chapter.

[ 1991 c 323 s 11.]